Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5829.06
Rehabilitation beds; moratorium; exceptions.

All rehabilitation beds which require a certificate of need are subject to a moratorium, unless one of the following exceptions applies:

(1) If the average occupancy for all rehabilitation beds located in Nebraska has exceeded ninety percent occupancy during the most recent three consecutive calendar quarters as reported at the time of the filing of the application, the department may grant an exception to the moratorium and issue a certificate of need. If the department determines the average occupancy for all rehabilitation beds located in Nebraska does not exceed ninety percent occupancy during the most recent three consecutive calendar quarters as reported at the time of the filing of the application, the department shall deny the application; or

(2) If the average occupancy for all rehabilitation beds within a health planning region exceeds eighty percent occupancy during the most recent three consecutive calendar quarters as reported at the time of the filing of the application and no other comparable services are otherwise available in the health planning region, the department shall grant an exception to the moratorium and issue a certificate of need for up to three rehabilitation beds.

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 25;

Laws 2008, LB765, § 2.
July 18, 2008